Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2043
Construction of act.

Nothing in the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act shall be construed to apply to any operations or activities regulated by the Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission or to operations or activities regulated under subsection (10) of section 81-1505.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 43.